Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 246 Department of Agriculture

246.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the state Board of Agriculture;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Structure” means a building erected as a shelter for human beings, animals or agricultural products, equipment, or supplies;

“Agriculture” means the business of raising or producing:

Crops, the products of which are used for food, feed, fiber, energy, or pharmaceuticals;

Horticulture products;

Tobacco;

Aquaculture products;

Livestock, poultry, and ratite birds and eggs;

Milk and milk products;

Eggs and egg products;

Bees and bee products; and

Timber;

“Horticulture” means the business of raising fruits, nuts, vegetables, flowers, ornamental plants, shrubs, trees, herbs, and the starts or transplants needed to produce these items;

“Aquaculture” means the science, art, and business of producing and raising aquatic organisms under controlled or semicontrolled conditions;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, or equine species, deer and elk, whose regulatory requirements are under KRS Chapters 150 and 246, that are privately owned and raised in a confined area for breeding stock, food, fiber, and other products; and

“Poultry” means chickens, ducks, turkeys, or other domestic fowl being raised or kept on any premises in the Commonwealth for profit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; 1970, ch. 96, § 1; 2001, ch. 46, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 88, § 3, effective March 28, 2002.

246.020.
Purpose of department.

The efforts of the department shall be directed to the promotion of the interests of agriculture and horticulture.

History.

33, 4618-78: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 216.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Apiary law, department to administer and enforce, KRS

252.180

to

252.240

.

Supervision and licensing of frozen food locker plants, KRS

221.020

,

221.030

.

246.030.
Organization of department.

The department shall consist of:

The Office of the Commissioner;

The Office of Agricultural Marketing, which shall include the following:

The Promotion and Development Division;

The Shows and Fairs Division;

The Livestock Division;

The Plant Division;

The Education and Outreach Division; and

The Direct Farm Marketing Division;

The Office for Consumer and Environmental Protection, which shall include the following:

The Division of Regulation and Inspection;

The Division of Food Distribution; and

The Division of Environmental Services;

The Office of State Veterinarian, which shall include the following:

The Division of Animal Health; and

The Division of Producer Services;

The Office of Administrative Services, which shall include the following:

The Division of Human Resources;

The Division of Administrative Services; and

The Division of Information Technology;

The Office of Communications;

The Office of Legal Services;

The State Board of Agriculture; and

The Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy, which shall include the following:

Agricultural Development Board; and

Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.

HISTORY:

42a-3, 4618-17, 4618-18, 4618-79, 4618i-1: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 9, § 15; 1960, ch. 62, § 2; 1978, ch. 155, § 127, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 84, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 447, § 15, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 33, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 393, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 121, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 264, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 49, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 88, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 26, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 12, § 6, effective March 12, 2021.

246.040.
Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall be the head of the department. He shall keep his office at the seat of government and devote his entire time to the duties of his office.

The Commissioner may employ necessary personnel to assist in carrying out his duties.

History.

32, 41, 4618-78, 4618-79: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 26, § 6; 1946, ch. 27, § 24; 1950, ch. 123, § 29, effective January 7, 1952; 2002, ch. 88, § 4, effective March 28, 2002.

246.043.
Executive director of Office of Agri-Business Standards. [Repealed.]

246.046.
Executive director of Office of Environmental Advocacy. [Repealed.]

246.050.
Department may engage in field demonstration and educational work. [Repealed.]

246.055.
Acceptance of federal aid, gifts — Distribution — Agreement with federal government.

The Department of Agriculture may accept federal aid, gifts, donations, or devises. The Department of Agriculture is authorized in its discretion to accept the provisions of any Act of Congress appropriating, granting, or apportioning funds or commodities to the state for use in connection with any program of the Department of Agriculture. The Commissioner shall prescribe for the proper apportionment and distribution of these funds, property or commodities in accordance with the state and federal laws.

The Commissioner of Agriculture may enter into any agreement and carry out the terms of such agreement with any department of the federal government to handle funds, commodities or any devise under any program assigned to or handled by the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 158, effective June 16, 1960.

246.057.
Metrology lab fees.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations establishing license fees, testing fees, and any other fees necessary to operate and maintain a metrology lab within the department. Fees shall be established at a level that shall not exceed the actual cost of operating and maintaining the metrology lab.

All amounts received from any fees imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in a restricted fund and shall not be used for any other purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 9, effective June 4, 2010.

246.060.
Department to furnish information as to credit unions. [Repealed.]

246.065.
Identification of lands of statewide agricultural importance.

The State Department of Agriculture shall identify lands of statewide agricultural importance through the use of the United States Department of Agriculture’s land evaluation and site assessment program and the state’s geographic information system. The department shall provide information on the location of agricultural lands of statewide importance to each local planning unit operating under the requirements of KRS Chapter 100.

The department is authorized to promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 390, § 30, effective July 15, 1994.

246.070.
Functions of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall promote and encourage, as far as practicable, the organization of agricultural organizations and associations. He shall ascertain in detail the quality and quantity of land under cultivation; the kinds, amounts and value of the annual field crops; the annual production of orchards, gardens, and dairies; the kinds, value, and increase of livestock; the character and wages of labor employed in the cultivation of the soil; and the value of agricultural exports and imports.

The Commissioner may, if he thinks it will promote the objects of the department, expend such sums as are available in the payment of premiums that he offers to encourage the agricultural industry of the state.

History.

33, 39: amend. Acts 2002, ch. 88, § 5, effective March 28, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Apiary law, commissioner of agriculture to administer and enforce, KRS

252.180

to

252.240

.

Soybean promotion law, duties, KRS

247.510

to

247.595

.

Supervision and licensing of frozen food locker plants, KRS

221.020

,

221.030

.

246.080.
Officers to furnish Commissioner information.

All officers of the state and counties shall furnish the Commissioner with such information within their power as he may require in regard to the matters connected with the department. The Commissioner shall also put himself in communication with the different agricultural associations and organizations and such other organizations or persons in or out of the state, as he may deem proper, in order to secure information.

History.

34: amend. Acts 2002, ch. 88, § 6, effective March 28, 2002.

246.090.
Commissioner to issue monthly reports — Publication. [Repealed.]

246.100.
Annual report on state, to induce immigration. [Repealed.]

246.105.
Report of ownership of agricultural land by foreign investors. [Repealed.]

246.110.
Report to General Assembly. [Repealed.]

246.120.
State Board of Agriculture.

The board shall consist of eighteen (18) members as follows:

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, who shall be a voting member and serve as chairman;

The dean of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture, Food and Environment or the dean’s designee, who shall be a voting member and serve as vice chairman;

Thirteen (13) citizens of the Commonwealth appointed by the Commissioner who shall serve as voting members, specifically:

Four (4) members who are farmers with experience in crop production, each of whom shall be selected from a list of at least three (3) individuals nominated by the Kentucky Corn Growers Association, the Kentucky Small Grain Growers Association, the Kentucky Soybean Association, or other similar trade organizations or commodity groups;

Four (4) members who are farmers with experience in animal agriculture, each of whom shall be selected from a list of at least three (3) individuals nominated by the Kentucky Cattlemen’s Association, the Kentucky Dairy Development Council, the Kentucky Pork Producers Association, the Kentucky Poultry Federation, the Kentucky Sheep and Goat Development Office, or other similar trade organizations or commodity groups;

Three (3) members who shall be appointed from the state at large who are farmers with due consideration to geographical distribution throughout the state and industry representation;

One (1) member who shall be appointed from a list of at least three (3) individuals nominated by the AgriBusiness Association of Kentucky or other similar trade organizations representing agribusiness; and

One (1) member who shall be appointed from a list of at least three (3) individuals nominated by the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation;

The state president of the Kentucky FFA Association who shall serve as a nonvoting member for the duration of his or her term;

The state president of the Kentucky Young Farmers Association who shall serve as a nonvoting member for the duration of his or her term; and

The state president of the Kentucky 4-H who shall serve as a nonvoting member for the duration of his or her term.

The members who serve on the board and were appointed by the Commissioner shall serve four (4) year terms and shall serve until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. No more than eight (8) of the thirteen (13) shall belong to the same political party.

Upon the expiration of the term of a member of the board, the Commissioner shall appoint a successor. A board member whose term has expired shall serve until a replacement has been appointed and qualified. No person shall serve on the board for more than twelve (12) years.

The board shall be a body corporate under the corporate name “State Board of Agriculture” and shall have the usual corporate powers.

History.

37-2, 37-3: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 122, § 1; 1994, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2019 ch. 88, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 150, § 1, effective March 29, 2021.

246.130.
Meetings of board — Quorum.

The board shall meet at least four (4) times per year to consider the general agricultural, horticultural, and forestry interests of the state, and to take the necessary steps for carrying out the purpose of the board. The Commissioner may, and at the request of eight (8) of its voting members, call its meetings and the board may adjourn any meeting to a time and place as may be determined. Eight (8) voting members shall constitute a quorum. Eight (8) members may call the board together for the transaction of business if the Commissioner, upon their request, refuses to do so.

HISTORY:

37-4: amend. Acts 1994, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 88, § 7, effective March 28, 2002; 2018 ch. 3, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 88, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

246.140.
Compensation of board — Limitation on days of session.

Except as provided in KRS

18A.200

, members of the board shall receive fifty dollars ($50) per day and actual traveling expenses while attending meetings of the board, but the total number of days the board may be in session shall not exceed thirty-six (36) per year.

History.

37-12: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 122, § 2; 1978, ch. 154, § 27, effective June 17, 1978; 1994, ch. 122, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

246.150.
Clerk and stenographers for board. [Repealed.]

246.160.
Board to advise Commissioner.

The board shall act as an advisory board to the Commissioner.

History.

37-8: amend. Acts 2002, ch. 88, § 8, effective March 28, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Grain warehouses, duty of board in connection with, KRS

251.020

.

246.170.
Board to report to General Assembly. [Repealed.]

246.180.
Duties of board as to immigration and emigration. [Repealed.]

246.190.
State farmers’ institute. [Repealed.]

246.200.
Delegates to institute — Crop reporters — Report on institute. [Repealed.]

246.210.
Access of department and agents, board and members, and others to premises — Destruction or slaughter of diseased livestock.

The department or its agents or employees shall have free access within reasonable hours to any farm, orchard, garden, elevator, warehouse, building, cellar, freight or express office or car, freight yard, vehicle, vessel, boat, container, or any other place which, for probable cause, it may be necessary or desirable for the agents to enter in order to enforce a quarantine against the European corn borer (Pyrausta nubilaslis).

The department or any of its agents or employees may, after reasonable notice, enter any premises for the purpose of inspecting or testing livestock to determine the existence of, or to combat in any way, communicable diseases. The owner of the livestock to be tested or inspected shall, after reasonable notice, confine and present the livestock to the agents or employees of the department. When the department or any of its agents or employees determines through inspection or testing that any livestock is infected with a communicable disease, they may enter any premises, after reasonable notice, and remove the diseased livestock, and have the livestock destroyed or slaughtered and the owner indemnified as provided in KRS

257.120

to

257.150

. When necessary the department or any of its agents or employees may call upon peace officers for assistance.

The state entomologist or his authorized agent shall, upon previous application, have free access within reasonable hours to any premises or containers for purposes of trapping, inspecting for, investigating, or treating the premises for the control of Japanese beetles (Popillia japonica).

The director of the agricultural experiment station and his agents shall have free access at all reasonable hours to any premises, vehicle, elevator, or steamship company, in the discharge of his duties under KRS

250.081

.

History.

30c-21, 42f-3, 42g-2, 63c-13, 68n-4, 1376b-22: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 248, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 217; 1990, ch. 97, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 370, § 12, effective April 8, 1994; 2002, ch. 88, § 9, effective March 28, 2002; 2002, ch. 240, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2002). This section was amended by 2002 Ky. Acts chs. 88 and 240, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

246.220.
Interference with officers prohibited.

No person shall in any way hinder, refuse, or defeat entrance or inspection by an agent or employee of the department who is performing the duties of his office for the purpose of combating the European corn borer under subsection (1) of KRS

246.210

.

No person shall interfere in any way with the department or any of its agents or employees in the inspection of premises and livestock, or in the testing of livestock on any premises when the object of the inspection or testing is to determine the existence of, or to combat in any way, communicable disease in livestock. No person shall interfere in any way with the department or any of its agents or employees in the removal from any premises of livestock found to be infected with a communicable disease.

No person shall hinder the efforts of the state entomologist or his agents in combating Japanese beetles under KRS

246.210

.

No person shall hinder the entomologist in the performance of any of his duties.

No person shall interfere in any way with inspectors or assistants while they are discharging their duties under KRS

250.021

to

250.111

.

No person shall hinder, prevent, or attempt to prevent any person from discharging his duties under KRS

250.491

to

250.631

.

No person shall in any way impersonate, hinder, or obstruct the department or its inspectors in the performance of their official duties under KRS

248.280

to

248.440

or

261.220

.

History.

42c-7, 42f-3, 42g-3, 63c-5, 63d-11, 68n-11, 1376b-23, 1719a-11, 4814c-18: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 126, § 31; 1962, ch. 248, § 3; 1966, ch. 255, § 218; 1980, ch. 188, § 230, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 370, § 13, effective April 8, 1994; 1996, ch. 142, § 17, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 88, § 10, effective March 28, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Penalty for interference with enforcement of apiary law, KRS

252.240

,

252.990

.

Penalty for interference with enforcement of baby chick law, KRS

257.990

.

246.230.
Study and survey of agricultural production and marketing. [Repealed.]

246.240.
Dairy products, collection and publication of information concerning. [Repealed.]

246.245.
Agriculture promotion fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a separate trust and agency account to be known as the “Agriculture Promotion Fund” to be administered by the Department of Agriculture for the purposes provided in this section. Any moneys accruing to this fund in any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any moneys deposited in the fund shall be used to purchase materials to promote agriculture in the Commonwealth;

Any moneys received from the sale of promotional materials shall be deposited in the fund; and

The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 20, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

246.247.
Agricultural program trust fund.

The agricultural program trust fund is hereby created as a separate revolving fund to be administered by the Department of Agriculture.

The fund shall consist of moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to KRS

186.050

and any other proceeds from grants, contributors, appropriations, or other moneys available for purposes of the trust fund.

Moneys in the fund shall be used for agricultural programs administered by the department.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any balance remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse. Any balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. Any interest earnings of the fund shall become part of the revolving fund and shall not lapse.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 3, § 1, effective March 6, 2009.

246.250.
State aid for promotion of purebred cattle industry — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Registered cattle” means cattle with approved registration papers from an appropriate association, organization, or authority;

“Pen sale cattle” means uniform groups of commercial or registered beef cattle;

“Market animals” means beef prospect steers and market heifers; and

“AOB” means all other breeds. AOB is any combination of two (2) or more registered breeds. Both beef and dairy cattle may have an AOB category.

The department shall support the development and the improvement of the cattle industry in Kentucky by promoting annual shows and sales of cattle with the purpose of establishing Kentucky as one of the greatest centers in the United States for the breeding, producing, raising, exhibiting, showing, and selling of cattle. The General Assembly shall make appropriations from the general expenditure fund for each fiscal year to effectuate that purpose.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, from the appropriations made in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, at least six thousand dollars ($6,000) shall be appropriated in each fiscal year for premiums and advertising expenditures for each of the following registered cattle breeds and other categories:

Angus;

Beefalo;

Charolais;

Chi;

Hereford;

Limousin;

Market animals;

Maine;

Pen sale cattle;

Red Angus;

Red Poll;

Salers;

Santa Gertrudis;

Shorthorn;

Simmental;

Ayrshire;

Brown Swiss;

Guernsey;

Holstein;

Milking Shorthorn; and

Jersey.

If a registered breed from subsection (3) of this section does not have enough entries to meet the minimum number required for a show, then it may combine with one (1) or more other registered breeds to form an AOB category. The AOB shall be funded in an amount equal to six thousand dollars ($6,000) from the allocations provided to the registered breeds that created the AOB. The funding shall be proportionately based on the number of entries per breed.

The remainder of the appropriations made in accordance with subsection (2) of this section for each fiscal year shall be used and applied by the department as follows: At least five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be divided between the Kentucky National Dairy Shows and Sales Board and the Kentucky Beef Expo Board to help cover facility and event costs; and the remaining balance shall be used and applied by the department in advertising and in promoting the cattle industry in Kentucky as the Commissioner may determine.

Only exhibitors participating in the Kentucky National Dairy Shows and Sales or the Kentucky Beef Expo are eligible for the funds appropriated in subsection (3) or (4) of this section;

Only eligible cattle from the United States and Canada may participate in the Kentucky National Dairy Shows and Sales or the Kentucky Beef Expo;

When animals of equal quality are consigned, first consideration shall be given to Kentucky-owned or Kentucky-bred cattle; and

In order to receive funding under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, each breed or category shall be required to match its appropriation on a dollar-for-dollar basis.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 109, § 1 to 5; 1956, ch. 82; 1962, ch. 242; 1968, ch. 91, § 1; 1974, ch. 216, § 1; 1978, ch. 42, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 247, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 185, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 378, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 387, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2008, ch. 90, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

246.260.
State aid for promotion of sheep industry.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Show, exhibition and sale” shall not include those held as a part of or in connection with any county or other local fair.

It shall be the duty of the department to aid, encourage, foster and promote the development and improvement of the sheep industry in Kentucky. To that end, it shall be the duty of the department to promote, and assist in the promotion of shows and sales of sheep in Kentucky with the object and purpose of maintaining Kentucky’s national recognition as a sheep state for breeding, producing, raising, exhibition, showing and sale of sheep and for said purposes there hereby is appropriated out of the general fund to the department the sum of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each of the fiscal years 1951-1952 and 1952-1953.

From the appropriation made in subsection (2) of this section, one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be used and applied in each of said fiscal years for the payment of premiums for district shows and sales which may be held in Kentucky in each of the fiscal years, 1951-1952 and 1952-1953 which is open on equal terms and conditions to all Kentucky 4-H club members with a sheep project. One thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be used and applied in each fiscal year for the payment of premiums for district shows and sales which may be held in Kentucky in each of the fiscal years, 1951-1952 and 1952-1953 which is open on equal terms and conditions to all Kentucky future farmer members with a sheep project. One thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be used and applied in each of the fiscal years for the payment of premiums for district shows and sales which may be held in Kentucky in each of the fiscal years, 1951-1952 and 1952-1953 which is open on equal terms and conditions to all Kentucky adult sheep raisers in Kentucky. No Kentucky adult sheep raiser may show, exhibit or sell in more than one district show.

Any show, exhibition and sale of sheep to be eligible to receive the aforesaid appropriations must provide that the entries in all classes must be open upon equal terms to all breeders of such sheep in Kentucky. The commissioner shall determine with respect to the aforesaid sheep which shows, exhibitions and sales in each year shall receive assistance and, in making such determination, he may consider such shows, exhibitions and sales as may have been held in Kentucky in any previous year and in any previous two (2) year period.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 166, §§ 1 to 4.

246.270.
Commissioner authorized to receive trust assets of Kentucky Rural Rehabilitation Corporation.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is hereby designated as the state official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to make application to and receive from the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, or any other proper federal official, pursuant and subject to the provisions of Public Law 499, 81st Congress, approved May 3, 1950, the trust assets, either funds or property, held by the United States as trustee in behalf of the Kentucky Rural Rehabilitation Corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 168, § 1.

246.275.
Agreements with Secretary of Agriculture of United States for purposes of Bankhead-Jones Farm Tenant Act.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, with the advice of the state Board of Agriculture, is authorized to enter into agreements with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States pursuant to Section 2(f) of the aforesaid act of the Congress of the United States, upon such terms and conditions and for such periods of time as may be mutually agreeable, authorizing the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States to accept, administer, expend and use in the Commonwealth of Kentucky all or any part of such trust assets, or any other funds of the Commonwealth of Kentucky which may be appropriated for such uses, for carrying out the purposes of Titles I and II of the Bankhead-Jones Farm Tenant Act, in accordance with the applicable provisions of Title IV thereof, as now or hereafter amended, and to do any and all things necessary to effectuate and carry out the purposes of said agreements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 168, § 2.

246.280.
Deposit and use of funds and proceeds of Kentucky Rural Rehabilitation Corporation assets.

Funds and the proceeds of the trust assets returned to the Commissioner of Agriculture pursuant to KRS

246.270

which are not retransferred to the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States pursuant to KRS

246.275

, shall be paid into the State Treasury and carried in a separate account for use for such of the rural rehabilitation purposes permissible under the charter of the now dissolved Kentucky Rural Rehabilitation Corporation as may from time to time be agreed upon by the Commissioner and the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, subject to the applicable provisions of said Public Law 499, or for the purposes of KRS

246.275

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 168, § 3.

246.285.
Powers of Commissioner concerning assets of Kentucky Rural Rehabilitation Corporation.

The Commissioner of Agriculture of the State of Kentucky is authorized and empowered to:

Collect, compromise, adjust or cancel claims and obligations arising out of or administered under KRS

246.270

to

246.290

or under any mortgage, lease, contract or agreement entered into or administered pursuant to KRS

246.270

to

246.290

and, if in his judgment, necessary and advisable, pursue the same to final collection in any court having jurisdiction;

Bid for and purchase at any execution, foreclosure or other sale, or otherwise to acquire property upon which the Secretary has a lien by reason of a judgment or execution, or which is pledged, mortgaged, conveyed or which otherwise secures any loan or other indebtedness owing to or acquired by the Secretary under KRS 246.270 to 246.290; and

Accept title to any property so purchased or acquired; to operate or lease such property for such period as may be deemed necessary to protect the investment therein; and to sell or otherwise dispose of such property in a manner consistent with the provisions of KRS 246.270 to 246.290.

The authority herein contained may be delegated to the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States with respect to funds and assets transferred to him pursuant to KRS

246.275

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 168, § 4.

246.290.
Nonliability of United States and Secretary of Agriculture.

The United States and the Secretary of Agriculture thereof, shall be held free from liability by virtue of the transfer of the assets to the Commissioner of Agriculture of the State of Kentucky pursuant to KRS

246.270

to

246.290

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 168, § 5.

246.295.
Administrative regulations relating to cervids — Costs resulting from importation of diseased animal.

The Department of Agriculture, in cooperation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, shall promulgate administrative regulations pertaining to health requirements, eradication of diseases, importation, and unique individual identification, including visual identification tags, of privately owned and farm raised cervids maintained for the production of meat and other products. Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources to regulate the unique individual identification, including visual identification, of captive cervids that are not privately owned and farm-raised cervids maintained for the production of meat and other products. The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources in cooperation with the Department of Agriculture, shall promulgate administrative regulations pertaining to the holding of cervids.

If any person imports a diseased animal into the Commonwealth in violation of the statutes and administrative regulations, then that person shall be responsible to the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Fish and Wildlife for all costs incurred in the investigation, response, and eradication of that disease.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 88, § 2, effective March 28, 2002; 2009, ch. 62, § 6, effective June 25, 2009.

246.300.
Transfer of functions relating to egg marketing from department of health to department of agriculture, labor and statistics. [Repealed.]

246.310.
Kentucky farm development authority — Members — Chairman — Quorum — Meetings — Salary — Regulations — Terms. [Repealed.]

246.320.
Authority may guarantee loans for purchase of farm lands or buildings — “Farm land” defined — Regulations. [Repealed.]

246.330.
Applications for guarantees — Contents. [Repealed.]

246.340.
Copy of mortgage and security agreement to be filed with application. [Repealed.]

246.350.
Applicant to agree to use land for farming purposes only — Authority may release agreement. [Repealed].

246.360.
Authority may employ personnel. [Repealed.]

246.370.
Letter of guarantee — Funding fee. [Repealed.]

246.380.
Default on guaranteed loan — Procedure. [Repealed.]

246.390.
Release of guaranteed loan paid in full. [Repealed.]

246.400.
No applicant to hold more than one guarantee. [Repealed]

246.410.
Farm development loan guarantee fund — Credits — Expenditures. [Repealed.]

246.420.
Tampering with or sabotaging livestock prohibited — Definitions for section — Applicability of KRS Chapter 512.

No person shall tamper with any livestock.

No person shall sabotage any livestock exhibited at an exhibition.

This section shall not apply to:

Any action taken or activity performed or administered by a licensed veterinarian or in accordance with instructions of a licensed veterinarian if the action or activity was undertaken for accepted medical purposes during the course of a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship; or

Generally accepted grooming, commercial, or medical practices that are not prohibited by any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder.

As used in this section:

“Tamper” means any of the following:

Treatment of livestock in such a manner that food derived from the livestock would be considered adulterated as defined in KRS

217.025

;

The injection, use, or administration of any drug that is prohibited under any federal law or law of this state, or any drug that is used in any manner that is not authorized under any federal law or law of this state. Whenever the commissioner of the United States Food and Drug Administration or the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture, pursuant to the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended, or federal Virus-Serum-Toxin Act, as amended, approves, disapproves, or modifies the conditions of the approved use of a drug, the approval, disapproval, or modification shall automatically be effective for the purposes of this section unless the Kentucky Department of Agriculture adopts an administrative regulation to alter, for the purposes of the section, the action taken by the commissioner or secretary. The Kentucky Department of Agriculture may adopt an administrative regulation if the department considers it to be necessary or appropriate for the protection of food safety or the health, safety, or welfare of livestock or to prevent the use of a drug for the purpose of concealing, enhancing, transforming, or changing the true conformation, configuration, or condition of livestock. No administrative regulation shall authorize the use of any drug the use of which is prohibited by, or authorize the use of any drug in a manner not authorized by, the commissioner or secretary under either of those acts;

The injection or other internal or external administration of any product or material, whether gas, solid, or liquid, to livestock for the purpose of concealing, enhancing, transforming, or changing the true conformation, configuration, condition, or age of the livestock or making the livestock appear more sound than it actually is;

The use or administration, for cosmetic purposes, of steroids, growth stimulants, or internal artificial filling, including paraffin, silicone injection, or any other substance;

The use or administration of any drug or feed additive affecting the central nervous system of the livestock;

The use or administration of diuretics for cosmetic purposes; and

The surgical manipulation or removal or tissue so as to change, transform, or enhance the true conformation or configuration of, or to conceal the age of, the livestock.

“Sabotage” means intentionally tampering with any livestock belonging to or owned by another person that has been registered, entered into, or exhibited in any exhibition, or raised with the apparent intent of being entered into an exhibition.

Where a person violates both the provisions of this section and a section of KRS Chapter 512, the person may be prosecuted under the provisions of KRS Chapter 512.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.